Utah statutes.
72-11-112.   Powers and authority of committee.
The committee, its officers, employees, and agents are authorized to carry out
the necessary procedures to implement the acquisition and development of a
passenger ropeway system together with the property, appliances, facilities,
rights of way and easements necessary or useful in connection with it and to
do anything not inconsistent with law which they consider necessary or
convenient to carry out the provisions of this chapter, whether or not the
authority is expressly granted in this chapter.
